Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-162
Vital resource emergencies; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds, for purposes of sections 84-162 to 84-167, that:

(1) Water for domestic, agricultural, and industrial use, food for domestic use, and adequate energy supplies are vital resources needed to sustain life;

(2) The interruption of supplies of these resources or the threat of such interruption may cause severe hardship or threaten the health and lives of the citizens of the state;

(3) The Governor, as chief executive, should have adequate means at his or her disposal to insure the health and welfare of the citizens of the state; and

(4) Sections 84-162 to 84-167 provide the additional emergency powers necessary for the Governor to act in specified vital resource emergencies.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 51.